California, session 20252026, SB48.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 33803.2 is added to the Education Code, to read:33803.2. The Office of Civil Rights shall employ the Religious Discrimination Prevention Coordinator, who shall be appointed by the Governor and confirmed by the Senate.SEC. 2. Section 33803.3 is added to the Education Code, to read:33803.3. The Office of Civil Rights shall employ the Race and Ethnicity Discrimination Prevention Coordinator, who shall be appointed by the Governor and confirmed by the Senate.SEC. 3. Section 33803.4 is added to the Education Code, to read:33803.4. The Office of Civil Rights shall employ the Gender Discrimination Prevention Coordinator, who shall be appointed by the Governor and confirmed by the Senate.SEC. 4. Section 33803.5 is added to the Education Code, to read:33803.5. The Office of Civil Rights shall employ the LGBTQ Discrimination Prevention Coordinator, who shall be appointed by the Governor and confirmed by the Senate.SEC. 5. This act shall become operative only if Assembly Bill 715 of the 2025–26 Regular Session is enacted and becomes effective on or before January 1, 2026.